Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.190

Confidential information—Public records act exemption.

(1) Information provided to the department of financial institutions by an agency of another state or the federal government, or regulatory association comprised of members of financial regulatory agencies, to the extent such information is confidential or exempt from disclosure under specific federal law or the specific laws of another state, shall be exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) The information in subsection (1) of this section is not exempt when included in records prepared by the department that represent agency action, as defined in RCW 34.05.010.

(3) For the purpose of regulating financial institutions, the director of financial institutions or the director's designee may enter into agreements governing the sharing, receiving, and use of documents, materials, or other information consistent with this section and chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2022 c 8 s 1.]